Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508C,

as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 297, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S.

Supp. 2025, Section 1210.508C), is amended to read as follows:

Section 1210.508C. A. To identify students who have a

deficiency in reading or who have characteristics of dyslexia that

lead to or cause reading difficulty, each student enrolled in

kindergarten and first, second, and third grade in a public school

in this state shall be screened at the beginning, middle, and end of

each school year for reading skills including, but not limited to,

phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, and

comprehension. A screening instrument approved by the State Board

of Education, in consultation with the Commission for Educational

Quality and Accountability and the Secretary of Education, shall be

utilized for the purposes of this section. In determining which

screening instrument to approve, the State Board of Education, the

Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability, and the

Req. No. 2219 Page 2

Secr etary of Education shall take into consideration at a minimum

the following factors:

1. The time required to conduct the screening instrument with

the intention of minimizing the impact on instructional time;

2. The timeliness in reporting screening instrument results to

teachers, administrators, and parents and legal guardians of

students; and

3. The integration of the screening instrument into reading

curriculum.

B. Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, the State Board of

Education shall approve no fewer more than three screening

instruments for use at the beginning, middle, and end of the school

year for monitoring of progress and for measurement of reading

skills as required in subsection A of this section. The screening

instruments shall meet the following criteria:

1. Assess for phonological awareness, decoding, fluency,

vocabulary, and comprehension;

2. Document the validity and reliability of each assessment;

3. Can be used for identifying students who are at risk for

reading deficiency and progress monitoring throughout the school

year;

4. Can be used to assess students with disabilities and English

language learners; and



Req. No. 2219 Page 3

5. Accompanied by a data management system that provides

profiles of each student, class, grade level, and school building.

The profiles shall identify each student’s instructional point of

need and reading achievement level. The State Board shall also

determine other comparable reading assessments for diagnostic

purposes to be used for students at risk of reading failure.

C. 1. Exemptions to the screening requirements of this section

may be provided to students who have documented evidence that they

meet at least one of the following criteria as related to the

provision of classroom instruction:

a. the student participates in the Oklahoma Alternate

Assessment Program (OAAP) and is taught using

alternate methods,

b. the student’s primary expressive or receptive

communication is sign language,

c. the student’s primary form of written or read text is

Braille, or

d. the student’s primary expressive or receptive language

is not English, the student is identified as an

English learner using a state-approved identification

assessment, and the student has had less than one (1)

school year of instruction in an English-learner

program.



Req. No. 2219 Page 4

2. A public school that grants an exemption pursuant to

paragraph 1 of this subsection shall provide ongoing evidence of

student progression toward English language acquisition with the

same frequency as administration of screening assessments. Evidence

may include, but not be limited to, student progression toward OAAP

reading essential elements, proficiency in sign language and reading

comprehension, and proficiency in Braille and reading comprehension.

D. 1. Students who are administered a screening instrument

pursuant to subsection A of this section and are found not to be

meeting grade-level targets shall be provided a program of reading

instruction designed to enable students to acquire the appropriate

grade-level reading skills. The program of reading instruction

shall be based on scientific reading research and align with the

subject matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education. A

program of reading instruction shall include:

a. sufficient additional in-school instructional time for

the acquisition of phonological awareness, decoding,

fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension,

b. if necessary and if funding is available, tutorial

instruction after regular school hours, on Saturdays,

and during summer; however, such instruction may not

be counted toward the one-hundred-eighty-day one-

hundred-eighty-one-day or one-thousand-eighty-hour



Req. No. 2219 Page 5

one-thousand-eighty-six-hour school year required in

Section 1-109 of this title,

c. assessments identified for diagnostic purposes and

periodic monitoring to measure the acquisition of

reading skills including, but not limited to,

phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,

and comprehension, as identified in the student’s

program of reading instruction,

d. high-quality instructional materials grounded in

scientifically based reading research, and

e. a means of providing every family of a student in

prekindergarten, kindergarten, and first, second, and

third grade access to free online evidence-based

literacy instruction resources to support the

student’s literacy development at home.

2. A student enrolled in kindergarten or first, second, or

third grade who exhibits a deficiency in reading at any time based

on the screening instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of

this section shall receive an individual reading intervention plan

no later than thirty (30) days after the identification of the

deficiency in reading. The reading intervention plan shall be

provided in addition to core reading instruction that is provided to

all students. The reading intervention plan shall:



Req. No. 2219 Page 6

a. describe the research-based reading intervention

services the student will receive to remedy the

deficiency in reading,

b. provide explicit and systematic instruction in

phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,

and comprehension, as applicable,

c. monitor the reading progress of each student’s reading

skills throughout the school year and adjust

instruction according to the student’s needs, and

d. continue until the student is determined to be meeting

grade-level targets in reading based on screening

instruments administered pursuant to subsection A of

this section or assessments identified for diagnostic

purposes and periodic monitoring pursuant to

subparagraph c of paragraph 1 of this subsection.

3. The reading intervention plan for each student identified

with a deficiency in reading shall be developed by a Student Reading

Proficiency Team and shall include supplemental instructional

services and supports. Each team shall be composed of:

a. the parent parent(s) or legal guardian guardian(s) of

the student,

b. the teacher assigned to the student who had

responsibility for reading instruction in that

academic year,

Req. No. 2219 Page 7

c. a teacher who is responsible for reading instruction

and is assigned to teach in the next grade level of

the student, and

d. a certified reading specialist or an individual with

advanced training or specialization in literacy

instruction, if one is available, and

e. the literacy coach assigned to the school district in

accordance with the provisions of subsection O of this

section, if one is assigned.

4. A school district shall notify the parent parent(s) or legal

guardian guardian(s) of any student in kindergarten or first,

second, or third grade who exhibits a deficiency in reading at any

time based on the screening instrument administered pursuant to

subsection A of this section. The notification shall occur no later

than thirty (30) days after the identification of the deficiency in

reading.

E. 1. Every school district shall adopt and implement a

district strong readers plan which has had input from school

administrators, teachers, and parents and legal guardians and if

possible a reading specialist, and which shall be submitted

electronically to and approved by the State Board of Education. The

plan shall be updated annually. School districts shall not be

required to electronically submit the annual updates to the Board if

the last plan submitted to the Board was approved and expenditures

Req. No. 2219 Page 8

for the program include only expenses relating to individual and

small group tutoring, purchase of and training in the use of

screening and assessment measures, summer school programs, and

Saturday school programs. If any expenditure for the program is

deleted or changed or any other type of expenditure for the program

is implemented, the school district shall be required to submit the

latest annual update to the Board for approval. The district strong

readers plan shall include a plan for each site which includes an

analysis of the data provided by the Oklahoma School Testing Program

and other reading assessments utilized as required in this section,

and which outlines how each school site will comply with the

provisions of the Strong Readers Act.

2. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the

implementation and evaluation of the provisions of the Strong

Readers Act. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to,

an analysis of the data required in subsection L P of this section.

F. 1. Any first-grade, second-grade, or third-grade student

who demonstrates proficiency in reading through a grade-level

appropriate screening instrument approved pursuant to subsection B

of this section shall not require a program of reading instruction

or an individual reading intervention plan. After a student has

demonstrated proficiency through a screening instrument, the

district shall provide notification to the parent or legal guardian

of the student that he or she has satisfied the requirements of the

Req. No. 2219 Page 9

Stro ng Readers Act. The district shall continue to monitor the

student in the next successive grade level to ensure he or she

maintains proficiency.

2. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, if a third-grade

student is identified at any point of the academic year as having a

significant reading deficiency, which shall be defined as not

meeting grade-level targets on a screening instrument administered

pursuant to subsection A of this section, the district shall provide

the student with intensive intervention services for the appropriate

amount of the instructional day consistent with the individual

reading intervention plan developed pursuant to paragraph 2 of

subsection D of this section and as determined by the Student

Reading Proficiency Team. Intensive intervention services shall

continue until the student demonstrates proficiency at his or her

grade level based on a screening instrument administered pursuant to

subsection A of this section.

G. Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, if a student has

not met grade-level performance based on scores for the standards

for reading foundations and processes and the vocabulary portions of

the statewide third-grade assessment administered pursuant to

Section 1210.508 of this title or is not subject to a good-cause

exemption as provided for in subsection K of this section, he or she

shall be retained in the third grade and provided intensive

intervention services and supports as provided for in subsection M

Req. No. 2219 Page 10

of t his section. The performance levels established by the

Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability pursuant to

Section 1210.508 of this title shall ensure that students meeting

the performance level criteria are performing at grade level on the

reading foundations and processes and the vocabulary portions of the

statewide third-grade assessment.

H. Each school district shall annually report in an electronic

format to the State Department of Education, the Office of

Educational Quality and Accountability, and the Secretary of

Education the number of third-grade students retained pursuant to

this section, the number of third-grade students promoted to the

fourth grade due to a good-cause exemption as provided for in

subsection K of this section by each category of good cause, the

number of students in kindergarten through third grade per grade

level who exhibit grade-level reading proficiency, the number of

students per grade level who received intensive intervention

services pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection F of this section,

the number of students per grade level who attended a summer academy

as provided for in Section 1210.508E of this title, the number of

students per grade level who exhibited improved reading proficiency

after completion of intensive intervention services, and the number

of students per grade level who are still in need of intensive

intervention services. The State Department of Education shall

publicly report the aggregate and district-specific numbers

Req. No. 2219 Page 11

subm itted pursuant to this subsection on its website and shall

provide electronic copies of the report to the Governor, Secretary

of Education, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Speaker of the

House of Representatives, and to the respective chairs of the

committees with responsibility for common education policy in each

legislative chamber.

H. I. The parent parent(s) or legal guardian(s) of any student

who is found to have a reading deficiency and is not meeting grade-

level reading targets and has been provided a program of reading

instruction as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection D of this

section shall be notified in writing of the following:

1. That the student has been identified as having a substantial

deficiency in reading;

2. A description of the current services that are provided to

the student pursuant to subsection D of this section;

3. A description of the proposed intensive intervention

services and supports that will be provided to the student that are

designed to remediate the identified area of reading deficiency as

provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of this section;

4. That a student who is shall not be promoted to the fourth

grade if he or she has not met grade-level performance based on

scores for the standards for reading foundations and processes and

the vocabulary portions of the statewide third-grade assessment

administered pursuant to Section 1210.508 of this title unless the

Req. No. 2219 Page 12

stud ent qualifies for a good-cause exemption as provided for in

subsection K of this section. A student who is promoted due to a

good-cause exemption shall receive supplemental intensive

intervention services;

5. Strategies for parents to use in helping their child succeed

in reading proficiency; and

6. The grade-level performance scores of the student.

I. J. No student may be assigned to a grade level based solely

on age or other factors that constitute social promotion.

J. K. For those students who have not met grade-level

performance based on scores for the standards for reading

foundations and processes and the vocabulary portions of the

statewide third-grade assessment administered pursuant to Section

1210.508 of this title, a school district may promote the student

for good cause only. Good-cause exemptions for promotion shall be

limited to the following:

1. English language learners who have had fewer than two (2)

years of instruction in an English language learner program;

2. Students with disabilities whose individualized education

program (IEP), consistent with state law, indicates that the student

is to be assessed with alternate achievement standards through the

OAAP;

3. Students who demonstrate an acceptable level of performance

on an alternative standardized reading assessment approved by the

Req. No. 2219 Page 13

Stat e Board of Education. A student shall be provided one

opportunity during the school year and one opportunity during the

summer pursuant to the provisions of Section 1210.508E of this title

to demonstrate an acceptable level of performance on an alternative

standardized reading assessment;

4. Students with disabilities who participate in the statewide

assessments administered pursuant to Section 1210.508 of this title

and who have an IEP that reflects that the students have received

intensive remediation in reading and have made adequate progress in

reading pursuant to the student’s IEP; and

5. Students who have received intensive remediation in reading

through a program of reading instruction for two (2) or more years

but still demonstrate a deficiency in reading and who were

previously retained in third grade.

L. 1. To request a good-cause exemption as provided for in

subsection K of this section, a third-grade student’s teacher shall

submit documentation to the school principal that indicates the

promotion of the student is appropriate and is based on the

student’s record. The documentation shall consist of the specific

good-cause exemption being requested and shall clearly prove that

the student is eligible for the exemption.

2. The principal shall review and discuss the recommendation

with the teacher and the third-grade student’s parent(s) or legal



Req. No. 2219 Page 14

guar dian(s) and shall make a recommendation in writing to the school

district superintendent as to whether the student shall be promoted.

3. After review, the school district superintendent shall

accept or reject the recommendation of the principal in writing.

4. The parent(s) or legal guardian(s) of a third-grade student

who is eligible for a good-cause exemption may choose that the

student be retained for one (1) year even if the school district

superintendent accepts a recommendation for a good-cause exemption

pursuant to this subsection.

M. Third-grade students who are subject to retention pursuant

to the provisions of this section shall receive a minimum of ninety

(90) minutes each school day of scientifically research-based

intensive intervention services that include instruction in

phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, and

comprehension and other strategies prescribed by a school district

which may include, but are not limited to:

1. Small group instruction;

2. Reduced teacher-to-student ratios;

3. Tutoring in scientifically research-based reading services

in addition to the ninety (90) minutes required by this subsection;

4. The option of transition classes;

5. Extended school day, week, or year;

6. Summer reading academies, as provided for in Section

1210.508E of this title; and

Req. No. 2219 Page 15

7. Placement of the student in a classroom with a teacher rated

superior or highly effective in accordance with the Oklahoma Teacher

and Leader Effectiveness Evaluation System.

N. Each school district may provide an intensive acceleration

class for retained third-grade students. The focus of the intensive

acceleration class shall be to increase the reading level of a

student at least two grade levels in one school year. The intensive

acceleration class shall provide reading instruction and

intervention for the majority of student contact each school day and

incorporate opportunities to master fourth-grade subject matter

standards in core academic areas.

O. 1. The State Department of Education shall employ literacy

coaches to assist in implementing the provisions of this act. Each

literacy coach shall:

a. (1) hold a master’s degree in education with three

(3) years of documented successful experience

teaching reading, or

(2) hold a bachelor’s degree with five (5) years of

documented successful experience teaching reading

with a minimum of three (3) years of literacy

experience at the state, district, or school

level,

b. have a valid certificate to teach issued by the State

Board of Education,

Req. No. 2219 Page 16

c. have experience delivering professional development

specific to literacy instruction, mentoring and

coaching classroom teachers, leading others in a

collaborative process, and analyzing and using student

performance data for instructional purposes, and

d. be trained and be competent to train others in

science-of-reading-based literary instruction

including, but not limited to, phonological awareness,

decoding, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension.

2. The State Department of Education shall assign literacy

coaches to school districts that are identified by the Department

based on the number and percentage of students scoring in the lowest

two performance levels on the standards for reading foundations and

processes and the vocabulary portions of the statewide third-grade

assessment administered pursuant to Section 1210.508 of this title.

3. Literacy coaches assigned to school districts pursuant to

the provisions of this subsection shall:

a. provide daily technical support to teachers

responsible for reading instruction and reading

specialists,

b. assist administrators, teachers responsible for

reading instruction, and reading specialists in

addressing grade-specific curriculum,



Req. No. 2219 Page 17

c. design and conduct professional development to meet

the needs of teachers responsible for reading

instruction and reading specialists,

d. provide clear, practical, timely, and candid written

and oral feedback to teachers responsible for reading

instruction and reading specialists, and

e. meet regularly with teachers responsible for reading

instruction, reading specialists, and principals to

review data and make recommendations for adjustments

in instructional practices.

P. 1. Each school district board of education shall annually

publish on the school website and report electronically to the State

Department of Education, the Office of Educational Quality and

Accountability, and the Secretary of Education by September 1 of

each year the following information on the prior school year:

a. the policies and procedures adopted by the school

district board of education to implement the

provisions of this section. The information submitted

shall include expenditures related to implementing the

provisions of this section, the number of staff

implementing the provisions of this section, and

average daily classroom time devoted to implementing

the provisions of this section,



Req. No. 2219 Page 18

b. by grade, the number and percentage of all students in

kindergarten through third grade who did not meet

grade-level targets based on a screening instrument

administered pursuant to subsection A of this section,

c. by grade, the number and percentage of all students in

kindergarten through third grade who have been

enrolled in the district for fewer than two (2) years,

d. by grade, the number and percentage of students in

kindergarten through third grade who demonstrated

grade-level proficiency based on a screening

instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of

this section, and

e. by grade, the number and percentage of students in

kindergarten through third grade who are on an

individualized education program (IEP) in accordance

with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act

(IDEA) and who demonstrated grade-level proficiency

based on a screening instrument administered pursuant

to subsection A of this section or an alternative

assessment prescribed by the student’s IEP.

2. The State Department of Education shall establish a uniform

format for school districts to report the information required in

this subsection. The format shall be developed with input from

school districts and shall be provided not later than ninety (90)

Req. No. 2219 Page 19

days prior to the annual due date. The Department shall annually

compile the information required, along with state-level summary

information, and electronically report the information to the

public, the Governor, the Secretary of Education, the President Pro

Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of

Representatives.

K. Q. The State Department of Education shall provide technical

assistance as needed to aid school districts in administering the

provisions of the Strong Readers Act.

L. R. On or before January 31 of each year, the State

Department of Education shall electronically submit to the Governor,

the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of

Representatives, and members of the committees with responsibility

over common education in both houses of the Legislature a Strong

Readers Report which shall include, but is not limited to, trend

data detailing three (3) years of data, disaggregated by student

subgroups to include economically disadvantaged, major racial or

ethnic groups, students with disabilities, and English language

learners, as appropriate for the following:

1. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in

kindergarten through third grade determined to be at risk for

reading difficulties compared to the total number of students

enrolled in each grade;



Req. No. 2219 Page 20

2. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in

kindergarten who continue to be at risk for reading difficulties as

determined by the year-end administration of the screening

instrument required in subsection A of this section;

3. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in

kindergarten through third grade who have successfully completed

their program of reading instruction and are reading on grade level

as determined by the results of screening instruments administered

pursuant to subsection A of this section;

4. The statewide aggregate and district-specific number and

percentage of students that meet or do not meet grade-level targets

for reading based on screening instruments administered pursuant to

subsection A of this section;

5. The amount of funds received by each district for

implementation of the Strong Readers Act;

6. An evaluation and narrative interpretation of the report

data analyzing the impact of the Strong Readers Act on students’

ability to read at grade level;

7. The type of reading instruction practices and methods

currently being used by school districts in the state;

8. Socioeconomic information, access to reading resources

outside of school, and screening for and identification of learning

disabilities for students not reading at the appropriate grade level

in kindergarten and first through third grade;

Req. No. 2219 Page 21

9. By grade level, the types of intensive intervention efforts

being conducted by school districts for students who are not on an

IEP and who are not reading at the appropriate grade level and for

students who are on an IEP and who are not reading at the

appropriate grade level; and

10. Any recommendations for improvements or amendments to the

Strong Readers Act.

The State Department of Education may contract with an

independent entity for the reporting and analysis requirements of

this subsection.

M. S. Copies of the results of the screening instruments

administered pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be made

a part of the permanent record of each student.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508D,

as amended by Section 6, Chapter 411, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.

2025, Section 1210.508D), is amended to read as follows:

Section 1210.508D. A. Contingent on the provision of

appropriated funds designated for the Strong Readers Act, school

districts may be allocated monies for each enrolled kindergarten

student or first-, second-, and third-grade student of the current

school year, including any student who has been retained in the

third grade pursuant to Section 1210.508C of this title, who is

found to be in need of remediation or intensive intervention

services in reading. The allocation shall be distributed to each

Req. No. 2219 Page 22

scho ol district upon approval of the strong readers plan for the

school district by the State Board of Education and the submittal of

a child-count report to the State Department of Education that

details the number of students identified as needing remediation or

intensive intervention services in reading. To determine a per-

student allocation amount, the total amount of funds available for

allocation each year shall be divided by the total number of

students in the state identified as in need of remediation or

intensive intervention services in reading as provided for in

Section 1210.508C of this title. Each school district shall be

allocated an amount equal to the per-student allocation amount

multiplied by the number of identified students enrolled in the

school district.

B. Beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, districts

receiving more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)

pursuant to subsection A of this section shall spend no less than

ten percent (10%) to provide professional development for teachers

teaching prekindergarten through grade five. The professional

development shall include training in the science of reading

including how students learn to read; training in providing explicit

and systematic instruction in phonological awareness, decoding,

fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension; implementing reading

strategies that research has shown to be successful in improving



Req. No. 2219 Page 23

read ing among students with reading difficulties; and instructional

materials required for implementation.

C. By June 30, 2022, the Department shall approve and publish a

list of professional development programs that are evidence-based

and directly address the cognitive science of how students learn to

read for which districts are permitted to use the funds received

under this section.

D. If a teacher attends and completes a professional

development institute in elementary reading approved by the

Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability during the

summer or when school is not in session, the teacher may receive a

stipend equal to the amount of the cost for a substitute teacher,

based on the amount of funds allocated.

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508E,

as amended by Section 7, Chapter 411, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.

2025, Section 1210.508E), is amended to read as follows:

Section 1210.508E. A. If a teacher determines that a student

in kindergarten or first through third grade is not reading at grade

level by the end of the second quarter of the school year, the

parent parent(s) or legal guardian guardian(s) of the student shall

be notified of:

1. The reading level of the student;

2. The program of reading instruction for the student as

required pursuant to the Strong Readers Act; and

Req. No. 2219 Page 24

3. The potential need for the student to participate in a

summer academy or other program designed to assist the student in

attaining grade-level reading skills.

B. A teacher who determines a student in kindergarten or first

through third grade is not meeting grade-level targets for reading

may shall, after consultation with the parent parent(s) or legal

guardian guardian(s) of the student, recommend that the student

participate in and complete a summer academy or other program.

C. Summer academy programs shall be designed to ensure that

participating students successfully complete grade-level

competencies in reading to enhance next-grade readiness. A summer

academy reading program shall be a program that incorporates the

content of a scientifically research-based professional development

program administered by the Commission for Educational Quality and

Accountability or a scientifically research-based reading program

administered by the State Board of Education and is taught by

teachers who have successfully completed professional development in

the reading program or who are certified as reading specialists.

D. School districts may approve an option for students who are

unable to attend a summer academy. The optional program may

include, but is not limited to, an approved private provider of

instruction, approved computer- or Internet-based instruction, or an

approved program of reading instruction monitored by the parent

parent(s) or legal guardian guardian(s). School districts shall not

Req. No. 2219 Page 25

be r equired to pay for the optional program but shall clearly

communicate to the parent parent(s) or legal guardian guardian(s)

the expectations of the program and any costs that may be involved.

E. 1. Beginning with the summer following completion of the

2027-2028 school year, each school district in this state shall

provide an in-person summer academy or other program to students

who:

a. do not meet grade-level performance based on scores

for the standards for reading foundations and

processes and the vocabulary portions of the statewide

third-grade assessment administered pursuant to

Section 1210.508 of this title, and

b. do not demonstrate an acceptable level of performance

on an alternative standardized reading assessment when

taken the first time during the student’s third-grade

year in accordance with the provisions of paragraph 3

of subsection K of Section 1210.508C of this title.

2. Students who participate in a summer academy or other

program pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be given

an alternative standardized reading assessment approved by the State

Board of Education pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 3 of

subsection K of Section 1210.508C of this title prior to July 1. A

student who demonstrates an acceptable level of performance on the

assessment shall be promoted to the fourth grade.

Req. No. 2219 Page 26

3. The summer academy or other program provided pursuant to

this subsection may be offered in cooperation with other school

districts or a public library or by contracting with a nonprofit

education organization. School districts shall notify the State

Department of Education by December 1, 2028, and each December 1

thereafter, of its plan to provide a summer academy or other

program.

F. Subject to the availability of funds, beginning one (1) year

after implementation of this section, the requirements of subsection

B of this section may be expanded to apply to students in fourth

grade. Each year thereafter, the requirements may be expanded by

one grade level until the requirements apply to third-grade students

through eighth-grade students. Summer academy programs shall be

designed for each grade level. Nothing in this section shall

prevent the State Board of Education or a school district board of

education from utilizing private, local, or federal funds to

implement this section.

F. G. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to

implement the provisions of this section which shall include

requirements for instructional time for summer academy programs,

teacher qualifications, and evaluation of student achievement as a

result of summer academy programs or other optional programs.

SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.



Req. No. 2219 Page 27

SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-2-2219 EB 12/18/2025 12:10:58 PM





































Req. No. 2219 Page 28